Maryland, session 2025, HB1059.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1059*

HOUSE BILL 1059
31–107.3.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR” MEANS THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF
THE EXCHANGE.
(3) “FUND” MEANS THE MARYLAND HELPING EVERYONE AFFORD
LIFE–SAVING TREATMENTS AND HEALTH CARE (HEALTH) FUND ESTABLISHED
UNDER THIS SECTION.
(4) “INCOME TAX CHECKOFF SYSTEM” MEANS THE CHECKOFF
SYSTEM ESTABLISHED UNDER § 2–112 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(B) (1) THERE IS A MARYLAND HELPING EVERYONE AFFORD
LIFE–SAVING TREATMENTS AND HEALTH CARE (HEALTH) FUND.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE ASSISTANCE TO
MARYLAND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ENROLLEES AND INDIVIDUALS WITH
HEALTH INSURANCE FOR HEALTH CARE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH HEALTH CARE
SERVICES AND BENEFITS PROVIDED UNDER STATE LAW THAT ARE SUBJECT TO
FEDERAL RESTRICTIONS, INCLUDING FUNDING RESTRICTIONS.
(3) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(4) (I) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(II) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND
SEPARATELY, AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(5) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(I) THE NET PROCEEDS FROM CONTRIBUTIONS UNDER THE
INCOME TAX CHECKOFF SYSTEM DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 2–113.2(B)(3)
OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE;
(II) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE
FUND; AND

HOUSE BILL 1059 3
(III) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED
FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(6) (I) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR PROVIDING ASSISTANCE
TO ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS WHO PROVIDE EVIDENCE OF A NEED FOR HEALTH CARE
ASSISTANCE FOR HEALTH CARE SERVICES AUTHORIZED UNDER STATE LAW THAT
HAVE BEEN IMPACTED BY FEDERAL RESTRICTIONS.
(II) THE FUND MAY NOT BE USED FOR ADMINISTRATIVE
EXPENSES.
(7) (I) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE
FUND IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(II) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE
CREDITED TO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(8) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(9) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND FOR HEALTH CARE
ASSISTANCE IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF
FUNDING THAT WOULD OTHERWISE BE APPROPRIATED TO THE EXCHANGE FOR
INDIVIDUALS FOR HEALTH CARE COSTS.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE AUGUST 31 EACH YEAR, THE EXECUTIVE
DIRECTOR SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE ADMINISTRATION OF
THE FUND.
(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE GROSS AMOUNT OF DONATIONS TO THE FUND
THROUGH THE INCOME TAX CHECKOFF SYSTEM AND OTHERWISE;
(II) THE COSTS OF ADMINISTRATION BY THE COMPTROLLER OF
THE INCOME TAX CHECKOFF SYSTEM; AND
(III) A DETAILED ACCOUNTING OF THE USE OF THE FUND.
(D) THE EXCHANGE SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 1059
Article – Tax – General
2–113.2.
(A) (1) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL INCLUDE ON THE INDIVIDUAL
INCOME TAX RETURN FORM A CHECKOFF DESIGNATED AS THE “MARYLAND
HELPING EVERYONE AFFORD LIFE–SAVING TREATMENTS AND HEALTH CARE
(HEALTH) FUND”.
(2) THE CHECKOFF SHALL STATE THAT:
(I) THE INDIVIDUAL, OR EACH SPOUSE IN THE CASE OF A JOINT
RETURN, MAY CONTRIBUTE TO THE MARYLAND HELPING EVERYONE AFFORD
LIFE–SAVING TREATMENTS AND HEALTH CARE (HEALTH) FUND THE AMOUNT
DESIGNATED BY THE INDIVIDUAL; AND
(II) 1. THE INDIVIDUAL SHALL DEDUCT THE AMOUNT OF THE
CONTRIBUTION FROM ANY REFUND TO WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL IS ENTITLED; OR
2. IF THE INDIVIDUAL IS NOT ENTITLED TO A REFUND,
THE INDIVIDUAL SHALL ADD THE AMOUNT OF THE CONTRIBUTION TO THE INCOME
TAX TO BE PAID WITH THE RETURN.
(3) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL INCLUDE, WITH THE INDIVIDUAL
INCOME TAX RETURN PACKAGE, A DESCRIPTION OF THE PURPOSES FOR WHICH THE
MARYLAND HELPING EVERYONE AFFORD LIFE–SAVING TREATMENTS AND
HEALTH CARE (HEALTH) FUND WAS ESTABLISHED AND THE PURPOSES FOR
WHICH THE FUND MAY BE USED.
(B) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL:
(1) COLLECT THE CHECKOFF CONTRIBUTIONS AND ACCOUNT TO THE
STATE TREASURER FOR THE MONEY COLLECTED;
(2) FROM THE CONTRIBUTIONS COLLECTED, DISTRIBUTE THE
AMOUNT NECESSARY TO ADMINISTER THE CHECKOFF SYSTEM TO AN
ADMINISTRATIVE COST ACCOUNT; AND
(3) AFTER THE DISTRIBUTION UNDER ITEM (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
DISTRIBUTE THE REMAINDER OF THE MONEY COLLECTED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION TO THE MARYLAND HELPING EVERYONE AFFORD LIFE–SAVING
TREATMENTS AND HEALTH CARE (HEALTH) FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER §
31–107.3 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 1059 5
10–804.
(M) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY DESIGNATE A CONTRIBUTION TO THE MARYLAND
HELPING EVERYONE AFFORD LIFE–SAVING TREATMENTS AND HEALTH CARE
(HEALTH) FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 31–107.3 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE
BY THE CHECKOFF SYSTEM ON THE RETURN.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.